District of Columbia statutes.
5-543.01

Minimum rate for original appointments; rates for reappointments.

(a)

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, all original appointments of police and fire privates shall be made at the minimum rate set forth in the schedule in § 5-541.01, and the 1st year of service shall be probationary.

(b)

Any officer or member of the Metropolitan Police force, the Fire Department of the District of Columbia, or the United States Park Police force who separates from that force, Department, or Division, and who is subsequently reappointed to such force, Department, or Division within 3 years after the date of such separation shall receive any scheduled rate of basic compensation provided in salary class 1 of the salary schedule in § 5-541.01(a) which does not exceed the scheduled rate of basic compensation being paid at the time of such reappointment for the class and service step he had attained at the time of his separation. For purposes of this subsection, no additional compensation authorized by this subchapter shall be used in determining service step placement.

(c)

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, employees appointed pursuant to § 1-610.72 shall be appointed at a step of Class 1 consistent with that officer’s law enforcement experience, without regard to any time in grade or prior Departmental service or incumbency requirements. Such employees shall serve an 18-month probationary period.

History

Aug. 1, 1958, 72 Stat. 483, Pub. L. 85-584, title III, § 301
Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1036, Pub. L. 93-407, title I, § 101(a)(4)
Nov. 15, 1977, 91 Stat. 1371, Pub. L. 95-179
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law § 13-160, § 103(c), 47 DCR 4619
Oct. 15, 2010, 124 Stat. 3033, Pub. L. 111-282, § 4(b)(2)(B)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-545.06a.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-410.
1973 Ed., § 4-827.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-160, in subsec. (a), substituted “Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section,” for “Except as provided in subsection (b)”, and added subsec. (c), relating to employees appointed pursuant to § 1-610.72.
Pub. L. 111-282, in subsec. (b), deleted “United States Secret Service Uniformed Division, ” preceding “or United States Park Police force”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-61, October 12, 1999, law notification 47 DCR 1983).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Clarifying Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-102, January 10, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 4339).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-137, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6802).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-175, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9236).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Clarifying Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-231, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 506).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-305, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2701).